Washington statutes.
RCW 19.72.080

Contribution among sureties.

Any one of several judgment defendants, and any one of several replevin bail having paid and satisfied the plaintiff, shall have the remedy provided in RCW 19.72.070 against the codefendants and cosureties to collect of them the ratable proportion each is equitably bound to pay.

[Code 1881 s 649; RRS s 979. Prior: 1877 p 135 s 652; 1869 p 151 s 589; 1854 p 211 s 431.]